Illinois, session 104th, SB870.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 5Section 1.1 as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 5/1.1)  (from Ch. 61, par. 1.1)7    Sec. 1.1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as 8the "Wildlife Code". 9(Source: P.A. 81-382.)